Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 4. Fishery Associations.

Sec. 16.40.240.
Regional dive fishery development associations.

The commissioner shall assist in and encourage the formation of qualified regional dive fishery development associations for the purpose of developing dive fisheries in administrative areas of the state in which dive fisheries exist. A regional dive fishery development association is qualified if the commissioner determines that the regional association

is incorporated as a nonprofit corporation under AS 10.20;

represents commercial fishermen who participate in each dive fishery in the region; and

possesses a board of directors that

is representative of commercial dive fishermen who fish in each of the significant commercial dive fishing areas in the administrative area;

has a member who is representative of fish processors who process dive fishery resources in the administrative area; and

has a member who is representative of municipalities in the administrative area.

In this section, “administrative area” has the meaning given in AS

43.76.210

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1997)

Sec. 16.40.250.
Salmon fishery associations.

The commissioner may assist in and encourage the formation of qualified salmon fishery associations for the purpose of promoting the consolidation of the fishing fleet in a salmon fishery for which the Alaska Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission has issued commercial fishing entry permits under AS 16.43. A salmon fishery association is qualified if the commissioner determines that the regional association

is incorporated as a nonprofit corporation under AS 10.20;

is comprised of interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the salmon fishery for which the association is established; and

has a board of directors that is comprised of interim-use permit and entry permit holders in the salmon fishery.

History.

(§ 1 ch 134 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For reimbursement of expenses of fleet reduction programs, see AS

16.43.330(c)

.

Administrative Code. —

For salmon fishery associations, see 5 AAC 93, art. 4.